Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska72-2307
Taxes authorized.

Any qualified public agency which has issued bonds in accordance with the Public Facilities Construction and Finance Act shall levy and collect taxes on all the taxable property within the territory of the qualified public agency, in addition to all other taxes, for the purpose of paying the principal and interest of such bonds as the principal and interest become due. Taxes levied for such purposes shall not be subject to the limitations in section 77-3442. The levying of taxes to pay such bonds for any county shall be subject to the constitutional limitation upon levying taxes by a county.

Laws 2005, LB 217, § 7.